District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
64 act may be cited as the “Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Functions Modernization
65 Amendment Act of 2026”.
66 Sec. 2. The Advisory Neighborhood Councils Act of 1975, effective October 10, 1975
67 (D.C. Law 1-21; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
68 (a) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.03) is amended as follows:
69 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
70 (2)(A) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
71 (3) New paragraphs (2) and (3) are added to read as follows:
72 “(2) Prior to its final proposal to establish single-member districts as provided in
73 paragraph (a)(1), the Council shall provide an opportunity for the Office of Advisory
74 Neighborhood Commissions to evaluate any such draft proposal to ensure the neighborhood
75 cohesiveness and viability of such single-member districts, and for the OANC to submit a report
76 to the Council on its findings and recommendations. The report shall be given great
77 consideration by the Council in the establishment of such single-member districts.
2

78 (3) Paragraph (b) is amended by striking the phrase “Council shall,” and inserting
79 the phrase “Council shall, after considering the report of the OANC provided in paragraph
80 (a)(2),” in its place.
81 (b) Section 8 (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.06) is amended as follows:
82 (1) Section 8(d)(6)(E)(ii) (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.06(d)(6)(E)(ii)) is amended
83 as
84 follows:
85 (2) Strike the phrase “the affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission, in
86 consultation with the OANC,” and insert the phrase “the Board of Elections” in its place.
87 (3) Strike the phrase “in consultation with the affected Advisory Neighborhood
88 Commission and the OANC” and insert the phrase “in consultation with the Board of Elections”
89 in its place.
90 (4) Strike the phrase “for counting and transmission of the results to the
91 OANC and the affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission” and insert the phrase “for
92 counting. The Board of Elections shall transmit the results to the OANC and the affected
93 Advisory Neighborhood Commission. Ballot counting shall be facilitated by at least two
94 representatives of the Board of Elections.” in its place.
95 (c) Section 8(e) (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.06(e)) is amended as follows:
96 (1) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
97 (2) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
98 “(2) When a Commissioner is a resident of the Central Detention Facility or
3

99 the Correctional Treatment Facility, a certification by the Department of Corrections that the
100 Commissioner has been transferred or is otherwise no longer a resident of the facility shall be
101 sufficient for the Board of Elections to declare the seat vacant.”.
102 (3) A new paragraph (e-1) is added to read as follows:
103 “(e-1) When a Commissioner dies in office, the Board of Elections
104 may accept a funeral home death notice or obituary, an obituary published in a newspaper of
105 general circulation, or any other proof of death the Board deems sufficient, and shall declare the
106 seat vacant.”.
107 (c) Section 13 (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.10) is amended as follows:
108 (1) Section 13(c) is amended as follows:
109 (A) Paragraph (2)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “§ 25-115(c) and
110 (e)” and inserting the phrase “Chapter 6 of Title 25 of the D.C. Official Code” in its place.
111 (2) Subsection (j) is repealed.
112 (3) Subsection (l) is amended by striking the word
113 “funds” and inserting the word “donations” in its place.
114 (4) Subsection (n) is amended by striking the phrase “Commission area.” and
115 inserting the phrase “Commission area. Quarterly allotments will be withheld from any
116 Commission without an approved annual fiscal year spending plan by November 30th of each
117 year until such time as an annual budget is approved and filed with the OANC.” in its place.
118 (d) Section 14 (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.11) is amended as follows:
119 (1) Section 14(d)(3) (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.11(d)(3)) is amended as
120 follows:
121 (A) Strike the phrase “An up-to-date” and insert the word “A” in its
4

122 place.
123 (B) Strike the phrase “within 30 days of any amendment to the bylaws”
124 and insert the phrase “within 30 days of adoption by the Commission. Any such bylaws, and all
125 amendments thereto, shall be effective only after transmittal to the Council and the OANC
126 pursuant to this paragraph and posting on the OANC’s website.”.
127 (2) Section 14(e)(2)(B) (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.11(e)(2)(B)) is amended as
128 follows:
129 (A) The existing text in paragraph (B) is designated as paragraph (B)(1).
130 (B) A new paragraph (B)(2) is added to read as follows:
131 “(2) If, within 30 days after the request, the Chairperson has not
132 scheduled the meeting, the vice-chairperson shall schedule the meeting.”.
133 (e) Section 15(d)(2)(B) (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.12(d)(2)(B)) is amended by striking
134 the phrase “Monitoring of” and inserting the phrase “Providing advice regarding” in its place.
135 (f)Section 16 (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.13) is amended as follows:
136 (1) A new paragraph (a-1) is added to read as follows:
137 “(a-1) Any release of ANC allotment funding which will result in a Commission’s
138 bank account or bank accounts exceeding a combined balance of $50,000 will be transferred to
139 the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Technical Support and Assistance Fund to be used in
140 support of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions.”.
141 (2) Subsection(l)(1)is amended by striking the phrase “staff salaries,” and inserting
142 the phrase “staff salaries, independent contractors, contracts for services, memoranda of
143 understanding with District government agencies, telecommunications service requests through
5

144 the Request Telecommunications Services system for products and services available in the
145 system,” in its place.
146 (3) Subsection (r) is amended as follows:
147 (A) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
148 (B) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
149 “(2) When Commission funds are used to pay for the cost or use of a
150 telephone, the contact number of that telephone must be publicly available.”.
151 (4) A new subsection (r-1) is added to read as follows:
152 “(r-1) A Commission may, through an interoffice transfer managed by the
153 OANC, transfer a portion of their annual allotment to a District agency that provides food,
154 shelter, or healthcare assistance. Fund transfers are subject to the availability of funds and may
155 not exceed the ANC’s annual allotment.”.
156 Sec. 3. Section 2(a) of the Redistricting Procedure Act of 1981, effective March 16, 1982
157 (D.C. Law 4-87; D.C. Official Code § 1-1041.01(a)), is amended as follows:
158 (a) The existing text in paragraph (a) is designated as paragraph (a)(1).
159 (b) A new paragraph (a)(2) is added to read as follows:
160 “(2) The Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions shall appoint one or
161 more staff members to serve as a technical advisor to each ward task force.”.
162 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
163 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
164 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
165 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
166 Sec. 5. Effective date.
6

167 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
168 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
169 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
170 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
7